pt-PT: Cabeça do rolo: Duplo; Único; Outro
el: Κεφαλή κυλίνδρου: Διπλός; Μονό; Άλλο
zh-TW: 滾輪頭: 雙重; 單倍; 其他
pl: Głowica rolki: Dual; Singiel; Inne
zh-CN: 滚轮头: 双温区; 单; 其他
ko: 롤러 헤드: 듀얼; 싱글; 기타
vi: Đầu lăn: Hai nhiệt độ; Đơn; Khác
lt-LT: Volelio galvutė: Dvigubas; Single; Kita
nb: Rullehode: Dobbel; Enkel; Annet
cs: Typ hlavy: Duální; Jedna funkce; Jiné
en: Roller head: Dual; Single; Other
es: Cabezal de rodillo: Doble; Individual; Otros
nl: Rollerkop: Dubbel; Single; Andere
de: Rollenkopf: Zwei; Einzel; Sonstiges
hu: Hengerfej: Dupla; Szimpla; Egyéb
fi: Jalaksen pää: Kaksiosainen; Yksittäinen; Muu
sk-SK: Valčeková hlava: Dvojitý; Jeden; Iné
da: Rullehoved: Dobbelt; Enkelt; Andet
th: หัวลูกกลิ้ง: คู่; แบบเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Cabeça do rolo: Dual; Único; Outro
it: Testina del rullo: Doppie; Singolo; Altro
sv: Rullhuvud: Dubbel; Enkel; Övrigt
ru: Роликовая головка: Двойной; Одинарный; Другой
ro-RO: Cap rolă: Dublu; Simplu; Altele
sl-SI: Glava valjčka: Dvojni; Enojni; Drugo
hr-HR: Glava valjka: Dvojni; Jednostruki; Ostalo
ja: ローラーヘッド: デュアル; シングル; その他
fr: Tête du rouleau: Double; Unique; Autre
bg-BG: Ролкова глава: Двоен; Единична; Други
tr: Rulo Kafası: Çift; Tek; Diğer